Illinois, session 104th, HB4618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Common 5Interest Community Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that a 7lack of transparency by boards in common interest communities 8leads to poor management, embezzlement, abuse of unit owners, 9unequal enforcement, special treatment, theft and other 10problems. It further finds that unit owners are forced to 11struggle with and are often forced to litigate against their 12own boards and property managers to access the documents of 13the association that the unit owners are entitled to see. The 14General Assembly further finds that boards and property 15managers often charge excessive fees to unit owners to review 16records and documents of their association. 17    Section 10. The Common Interest Community Association Act 18is amended by changing Sections 1-30 and 1-40 as follows: 19    (765 ILCS 160/1-30)20    Sec. 1-30. Board duties and obligations; records. 21    (a) The board shall meet at least 4 times annually.   HB4618- 2 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1    (b) A common interest community association may not enter 2into a contract with a current board member, or with a 3corporation, limited liability company, or partnership in 4which a board member or a member of his or her immediate family 5has 25% or more interest, unless notice of intent to enter into 6the contract is given to members within 20 days after a 7decision is made to enter into the contract and the members are 8afforded an opportunity by filing a petition, signed by 20% of 9the membership, for an election to approve or disapprove the 10contract; such petition shall be filed within 20 days after 11such notice and such election shall be held within 30 days 12after filing the petition. For purposes of this subsection, a 13board member's immediate family means the board member's 14spouse, parents, siblings, and children.15    (c) The bylaws or operating agreement shall provide for 16the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common areas 17and payments therefor, including the method of approving 18payment vouchers.19    (d) (Blank).20    (e) The association may engage the services of a manager 21or management company.22    (f) The association shall have one class of membership 23unless the declaration, bylaws, or operating agreement provide 24otherwise; however, this subsection (f) shall not be construed 25to limit the operation of subsection (c) of Section 1-20 of 26this Act.  HB4618- 3 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1    (g) The board shall have the power, after notice and an 2opportunity to be heard, to levy and collect reasonable fines 3from members or unit owners for violations of the declaration, 4bylaws, operating agreement, and rules and regulations of the 5common interest community association.6    (h) Other than attorney's fees and court or arbitration 7costs, no fees pertaining to the collection of a member's or 8unit owner's financial obligation to the association, 9including fees charged by a manager or managing agent, shall 10be added to and deemed a part of a member's or unit owner's 11respective share of the common expenses unless: (i) the 12managing agent fees relate to the costs to collect common 13expenses for the association; (ii) the fees are set forth in a 14contract between the managing agent and the association; and 15(iii) the authority to add the management fees to a member's or 16unit owner's respective share of the common expenses is 17specifically stated in the declaration, bylaws, or operating 18agreement of the association.19    (i) Board records.20        (1) The board shall maintain the following records of 21    the association on a website accessible to unit owners and 22    their authorized agents and make them available for 23    examination and copying at convenient hours of weekdays or 24    at a mutually convenient time and location within 30 miles 25    of the location of the common interest community by any 26    member or unit owner in a common interest community   HB4618- 4 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1    subject to the exemptions in subsection (m) authority of 2    the board, their mortgagees, and their duly authorized 3    agents or attorneys:4            (i) Copies of the recorded declaration, other 5        community instruments, other duly recorded covenants 6        and bylaws and any amendments, articles of 7        incorporation, articles of organization, annual 8        reports, and any rules and regulations adopted by the 9        board shall be available. Prior to the organization of 10        the board, the developer shall maintain and make 11        available the records set forth in this paragraph (i) 12        for examination and copying. An association's managing 13        agent must deliver all of the association's original 14        books and records to the association immediately upon 15        termination of its management relationship with the 16        association or upon such other demand as is made by the 17        Board. An association managing agent may keep copies 18        of the association records at its own expense. 19            (ii) All financial records for the last 7 years in 20        a spreadsheet format produced by Excel or similar 21        software in a manner that allows unit owners to 22        download and manipulate or organize the data using 23        Excel or similar software. Financial records include, 24        but are not limited to, the income statement, balance 25        sheet, check register, current budget with monthly 26        variation, detailed records of receipts and   HB4618- 5 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1        expenditures affecting the operation and 2        administration of the association, reserve account 3        details, tax returns and other appropriate accounting 4        records. Detailed and accurate records in 5        chronological order of the receipts and expenditures 6        affecting the common areas, specifying and itemizing 7        the maintenance and repair expenses of the common 8        areas and any other expenses incurred, and copies of 9        all contracts, leases, or other agreements entered 10        into by the board shall be maintained.11            (iii) The minutes of all meetings of the board 12        which shall be maintained for not less than 7 years.13            (iv) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 14        ballots and proxies related thereto, if any, for any 15        election held for the board and for any other matters 16        voted on by the members, which shall be maintained for 17        not less than one year.18            (v) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 19        such other records of the board as are available for 20        inspection by members of a not-for-profit corporation 21        pursuant to Section 107.75 of the General Not For 22        Profit Corporation Act of 1986 shall be maintained.23            (vi) With respect to units owned by a land trust, a 24        living trust, or other legal entity, the trustee, 25        officer, or manager of the entity may designate, in 26        writing, a person to cast votes on behalf of the member   HB4618- 6 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1        or unit owner and a designation shall remain in effect 2        until a subsequent document is filed with the 3        association.4            (vii) Any reserve study. 5        (2) Where a request for records under this subsection 6    is made in writing to the board or its agent, failure to 7    provide the requested record or to respond within 30 days 8    shall be deemed a denial by the board.9        (3) A reasonable fee may be charged by the board for 10    the actual cost of retrieving and copying records properly 11    requested but may not charge any fee for access to or 12    downloading by a unit owner of electronic records stored 13    on a website or other accessible electronic file. A unit 14    owner has the right to request these records by 15    photocopying or through electronic means.16        (4) If the board fails to provide records properly 17    requested under paragraph (1) of this subsection (i) 18    within the time period provided in that paragraph (1), the 19    member may seek appropriate relief and shall be entitled 20    to an award of reasonable attorney's fees and costs if the 21    member prevails and the court finds that such failure is 22    due to the acts or omissions of the board of managers or 23    the board of directors.24    (j) The board shall have standing and capacity to act in a 25representative capacity in relation to matters involving the 26common areas or more than one unit, on behalf of the members or   HB4618- 7 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1unit owners as their interests may appear.2    (k) The board may contract with the highway commissioner 3of a road district in which the association is located, if the 4association comprises 50% of the population or greater of the 5township or road district, to furnish materials related to the 6maintenance or repair of roads. Any such purchases shall be 7included in the board's finance report as outlined in Section 81-45.9    (l) A board may not require a unit owner to sign a 10nondisclosure or confidentiality agreement concerning the 11board or association.12    (m) Records provided under this Section may not be used 13for commercial purposes other than to sell or purchases 14properties in the association and may be withheld from 15inspection and copying to the extent that the records concern:16            (i) personnel and medical records relating to 17        specific individuals;18            (ii) contracts, leases, and other commercial 19        transactions to purchase or provide goods or services 20        currently being negotiated;21            (iii) attorney-client privileged details of 22        current or potential litigation or mediation, 23        arbitration, or administrative proceedings;24            (iv) attorney-client privileged details of current 25        or potential matters involving federal, State, or 26        local administrative or other formal proceedings   HB4618- 8 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1        before a governmental tribunal for enforcement of the 2        governing documents;3            (v) legal advice or communications for current or 4        potential matters that are otherwise protected by the 5        attorney-client privilege or the attorney work product 6        doctrine, including communications with the managing 7        agent or other agent of the association;8            (vi) information the disclosure of which would 9        violate a court order or law;10            (vii) records of an executive session of the 11        board;12            (viii) the personal phone number of a member if 13        requested to be held confidential by the member; and14            (ix) security access information provided to the 15        association for emergency purposes. 16(Source: P.A. 102-921, eff. 5-27-22; 103-486, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    (765 ILCS 160/1-40)18    Sec. 1-40. Meetings. 19    (a) Notice of any membership meeting shall be given 20detailing the time, place, and purpose of such meeting no less 21than 14 10 and no more than 30 days prior to the meeting 22through a prescribed delivery method, or if requested by a 23unit owner, by first class mail by the United States Postal 24Service.25    (b) Meetings.   HB4618- 9 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1        (1) Twenty percent of the membership shall constitute 2    a quorum, unless the community instruments indicate a 3    lesser amount.4        (2) The membership shall hold an annual meeting. The 5    board of directors may be elected at the annual meeting. 6        (3) Special meetings of the board may be called by the 7    president, by 25% of the members of the board, or by any 8    other method that is prescribed in the community 9    instruments. Special meetings of the membership may be 10    called by the president, the board, 20% of the membership, 11    or any other method that is prescribed in the community 12    instruments.13        (4) The Except to the extent otherwise provided by 14    this Act, the board shall give the members notice of all 15    board meetings at least 14 days 48 hours prior to the 16    meeting by sending notice by using a prescribed delivery 17    method and or by posting copies of notices of meetings in 18    entranceways, elevators, or other conspicuous places in 19    the common areas of the common interest community at least 20    48 hours prior to the meeting except where there is no 21    common entranceway for 7 or more units, the board may 22    designate one or more locations in the proximity of these 23    units where the notices of meetings shall be posted. The 24    board shall give members notice of any board meeting, 25    through a prescribed delivery method, concerning the 26    adoption of (i) the proposed annual budget, (ii) regular   HB4618- 10 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1    assessments, or (iii) a separate or special assessment 2    within 14 10 to 60 days prior to the meeting, unless 3    otherwise provided in Section 1-45 (a) or any other 4    provision of this Act.5        (5) Meetings of the board shall be open to any unit 6    owner or a person specifically invited to the meeting by 7    the unit owner. A , except that the board may close any 8    portion of a noticed meeting or meet separately from a 9    noticed meeting: (i) to discuss litigation when an action 10    against or on behalf of the particular association has 11    been filed and is pending in a court or administrative 12    tribunal, or when the common interest community 13    association finds that such an action is probable or 14    imminent, (ii) to discuss third party contracts or 15    information regarding appointment, employment, 16    engagement, or dismissal of an employee, independent 17    contractor, agent, or other provider of goods and 18    services, (iii) to interview a potential employee, 19    independent contractor, agent, or other provider of goods 20    and services, (iv) to discuss violations of rules and 21    regulations of the association, (v) to discuss a member's 22    or unit owner's unpaid share of common expenses, or (vi) 23    to consult with the association's legal counsel. Any vote 24    on these matters shall be taken at a meeting or portion 25    thereof open to any member.26        (6) The board must reserve a portion of the meeting of   HB4618- 11 -LRB104 15627 JRC 28794 b1    the board for comments by members; provided, however, the 2    duration and meeting order for the member comment period 3    is within the sole discretion of the board.4        (7) The board must offer video conferencing for unit 5    owners who physically cannot attend a meeting. A unit 6    owner may choose a proxy to attend a meeting and represent 7    the owner but must identify the proxy to the board via a 8    prescribed delivery method at least one day before the 9    meeting. All meetings may be recorded by any unit owner or 10    by the owner's invitee or proxy. 11(Source: P.A. 99-567, eff. 1-1-17.)